Indiana, session 2026, HB1179.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-2.1-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOW [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
Chapter 5. Legislative Term Limits
Sec. 1. This chapter applies to an individual elected or appointed
as a state senator or state representative after November 3, 2026.
Sec. 2. An individual may serve as a state senator or state
representative until the earlier of the following:
(1) The date on which the individual completes twenty (20)
total combined years of service as a state senator or state
representative.
(2) The individual's seventieth birthday.
2026 IN 1179—LS 6706/DI 144